District of Columbia statutes.
25-508

Minimum fee for permits and manager’s license.

The minimum fees for permits and manager’s license shall be as follows:

Brew pub permit
$3,000/year

Tasting permit for class A licensees
$100/year

Importation permit
$5

Manager’s license
$100/year

On-site sales and consumption permit
$1,000/year

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2002(d), 61 DCR 9990
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added the last line in the table, the $1000 annual fee for an on-site sales and consumption permit.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2002(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).